Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.411

Violations—Penalty.

Any person acting as a real estate broker, managing broker, or real estate firm, without a license, or violating any of the provisions of this chapter, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2008 c 23 s 42; 1997 c 322 s 21; 1951 c 222 s 20; 1941 c 252 s 23; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8340-46. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 129 s 17. Formerly RCW 18.85.340.]